Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Part 6

Board of Directors

69-5-601. Appointment — Qualifications — Term — Duties and powers.

Except as provided in subsection (b), after a district has been located and established as provided, the county legislative body shall appoint two (2) directors, or in its discretion, four (4) directors of the district, who shall be owners of lands, or interested in lands, in the district, and at least one (1) of those first appointed to be one of the petitioners for the establishment of the district or a petitioner's successor in estate or interest, the directors to hold their offices for two (2) years from the date of appointment. These two (2) or four (4) thus appointed and their successors, together with the county mayor, shall constitute the directors, or board of directors, of such district, and as directors shall have the general control and management of the business affairs of the district and supervision of the district, and be vested with power to make contracts, for all improvement to be done in the district.

In any county having a population of not less than thirty-four thousand eight hundred fifty (34,850) nor more than thirty-five thousand (35,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the county legislative body may, in its discretion, appoint six (6) directors of the drainage district. If the county legislative body elects, in its discretion, to appoint six (6) such directors, the directors shall otherwise comply with all the requirements governing directors of drainage districts set out in subsection (a).

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 18; Shan., § 3871a78; Code 1932, § 4306; Acts 1972, ch. 846, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1201; Acts 1993, ch. 26, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; T.C.A. §69-6-601.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

69-5-602. Vacancies — Removal for cause — Trial and appeal.

If there is a vacancy in the office of the director appointed as mentioned in §69-5-601, because of death, resignation, or other reason, the county legislative body shall appoint another director of like qualifications to fill such vacancy until the end of the two-year term, and for sufficient reason the county legislative body may remove a director so appointed, but not until such director has had at least five (5) days' notice of the time of the hearing, and of the grounds on which the director should be removed, as alleged, and the director shall thus be entitled to be heard and to introduce proof upon the issue as to whether the director should be so removed as a director. If, on the hearing, the decision of the county legislative body is that the director be removed, the director may appeal from the decision, on giving proper cost bond, to the circuit court of the county, where the matter shall be heard anew and such judgment given as that court deems just and proper. If a director is removed, the county legislative body shall appoint another to serve the remainder of the two-year term, having like qualifications as to ownership of lands, as provided in this part.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 18; Shan., § 3871a79; Code 1932, § 4307; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1202; T.C.A. §69-6-602.

69-5-603. Subsequent appointments.

At the end of each two-year term, the office of the appointed directors shall be again filled by appointment by the county legislative body from among those owning or interested in lands in such district.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 18; Shan., § 3871a80; Code 1932, § 4308; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1203; T.C.A. §69-6-603.

69-5-604. Officers — Bond of treasurer.

The county mayor shall be chair of the board of directors, and the board shall elect one (1) of the other directors secretary and treasurer of the board, who, as treasurer, shall give bond in the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to faithfully account for all money coming into the treasurer's hands, the bond to be approved by the county legislative body and payable to the county or state, for the use of the district, and to be recorded in the drainage record.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 18; Shan., § 3871a81; Code 1932, § 4309; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1204; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2; T.C.A. §69-6-604.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

69-5-605. Tie votes.

When there is an even number of directors of such district and there is a tie vote on any matter coming before the board of directors, then the chair has the right to give the deciding vote.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 25, § 11; Shan., § 3871a121; Code 1932, § 4350; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1205; T.C.A. §69-6-605.

69-5-606. Compensation and expenses of directors.

Members of the board of directors shall receive as compensation for their services, in attending to their duties as directors, fifty cents (50¢) per hour for the time actually consumed in attending to such duties, but not to exceed twenty-five (25) hours in any one (1) month, and also their actual expenses paid out or incurred on account of attending to their duties as directors. The account for time and expenses shall be kept, made out, sworn to, and filed with the clerk of the county before payment is made.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 36; 1915, ch. 63, § 5; Shan., § 3871a144; Code 1932, § 4379; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1206; T.C.A. §69-6-606.